Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1412.02
Handgun qualification register; requirements; fine.

The person in charge of any agency employing law enforcement officers as defined in section 81-1401 shall submit to the council a register of full-time, part-time, and reserve law enforcement officers employed by his or her agency and whether each law enforcement officer passed or failed the handgun qualification. The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the submission of agency registers. The register shall include the name of each law enforcement officer, whether the law enforcement officer passed or failed the handgun qualification, the name of the instructor who administered the course, the date of handgun qualification, and the type of handgun used in handgun qualification. An agency that fails to submit a handgun qualification register pursuant to this section shall be subject to a fine of one hundred dollars for each day of noncompliance. All fines collected under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Law Enforcement Improvement Fund.

Laws 1996, LB 1055, § 15;

Laws 1999, LB 205, § 4.